Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7017
Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act, how cited.

Sections 77-7017 to 77-7022 shall be known and may be cited as the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 50.
January 1, 2035